Washington statutes.
RCW 15.76.100

Declaration of public interest—Allocation of state funds authorized.

It is hereby declared that it is in the public interest to hold agricultural fairs, including the exhibition of livestock and agricultural produce of all kinds, as well as related arts and manufactures; including products of the farm home and educational contest, displays, and demonstrations designed to train youth and to promote the welfare of farm people and rural economic development. Fairs qualifying hereunder shall be eligible for allocations from the state fair fund and for capital funding when appropriated to the department of agriculture, as provided in this chapter.

[ 2018 c 280 s 1; 2012 c 221 s 1; 1961 c 61 s 1.]